Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.515

Reporting of modification or termination of order.

In any situation where a protection order issued under this chapter is modified or terminated before its expiration date, the clerk of the court shall forward on the same day a true copy of the modified order or the termination order to the law enforcement agency specified in the modified or termination order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall promptly enter it in the computer-based criminal intelligence information system, or if the order is terminated, remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

[ 2021 c 215 s 64.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.